Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Incarceration of State Offenders in County Owned or Leased Correctional Facilities

§ 47-5-931.
Authorization for incarceration of state offenders at county or regional correctional facility.

The Department of Corrections, in its discretion, may contract with the board of supervisors of one or more counties and/or with a regional facility operated by one or more counties, to provide for housing, care and control of offenders who are in the custody of the State of Mississippi. Any facility owned or leased by a county or counties for this purpose shall be designed, constructed, operated and maintained in accordance with American Correctional Association standards, and shall comply with all constitutional standards of the United States and the State of Mississippi, and with all court orders that may now or hereinafter be applicable to the facility. If the Department of Corrections contracts with more than one (1) county to house state offenders in county correctional facilities, excluding a regional facility, then the first of such facilities shall be constructed in Sharkey County and the second of such facilities shall be constructed in Jefferson County.

The Department of Corrections shall contract with the board of supervisors of the following counties to house state inmates in regional facilities: (a) Marion and Walthall Counties; (b) Carroll and Montgomery Counties; (c) Stone and Pearl River Counties; (d) Winston and Choctaw Counties; (e) Kemper and Neshoba Counties; (f) Holmes County and any contiguous county in which there is located an unapproved jail; and (g) Bolivar County and any contiguous county in which there is located an unapproved jail. The Department of Corrections may contract with the board of supervisors of the following counties to house state inmates in regional facilities: (a) Yazoo County, (b) Chickasaw County, (c) George and Greene Counties, (d) Washington County, (e) Hinds County, and (f) Alcorn County. The Department of Corrections shall decide the order of priority of the counties listed in this subsection with which it will contract for the housing of state inmates. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “unapproved jail” means any jail that the local grand jury determines should be condemned or has found to be of substandard condition or in need of substantial repair or reconstruction.

In addition to the offenders authorized to be housed under subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Corrections may contract with the Kemper and Neshoba regional facility to provide for housing, care and control of not more than seventy-five (75) additional offenders who are in the custody of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2014.).

§ 47-5-933.
Contracts for incarceration of state offenders in county facilities; medical care.

The Department of Corrections may contract for the purposes set out in Section 47-5-931 for a period of not more than twenty (20) years. The contract may provide that the Department of Corrections pay a fee of up to Twenty-nine Dollars and Seventy-four Cents ($29.74) per day for each offender that is housed in the facility. The Department of Corrections may include in the contract, as an inflation factor, a three percent (3%) annual increase in the contract price. The state shall retain responsibility for medical care for state offenders to the extent that is required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 539, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 47-5-934.
Extension of contracts for incarceration in event of disruption due to natural disaster.

If a regional facility authorized under Section 47-5-931 experiences a disruption in the housing of state inmates due to a natural disaster in which the Governor has declared a disaster emergency under the laws of this state or the President of the United States has declared an emergency or major disaster to exist in this state, notwithstanding the limitation prescribed in Section 47-5-933, the term of the contract entered into by the Department of Corrections and the board of supervisors of the involved county or counties may be extended for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 617, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 47-5-935.
Sheriff of county designated Chief Corrections Officer for facility; responsibilities; additional compensation.

Concurrent with the execution of a contract for housing of state offenders as authorized by Sections 47-5-931 through 47-5-941, the sheriff of a county where the facility is located is designated as the Chief Corrections Officer for the facility housing state offenders, and in that capacity, shall assume responsibility for management of the corrections facility and for the provision of the care and control of the state offenders housed therein. The sheriff shall be subject to the direction of the department for management of the correctional facility. In addition to the compensation provided by Section 25-3-25, the sheriff shall receive Fifteen Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($15,600.00) as compensation for the duties specified in Sections 47-5-931 through 47-5-941.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 47-5-937.
Exercise of power and authority regarding facility; exemption from certain requirements or restrictions.

Sections 47-5-931 through 47-5-941 shall be full and complete authority for the exercise of all powers and authority granted herein and no requirements or restrictions of law which would otherwise be applicable to acts of the county or sheriff or the Department of Corrections shall be applicable except as expressly provided herein. The sheriff is expressly authorized to employ counsel to represent the facility to be paid a salary within the range allowed for a legal assistant to a district attorney with the employment to continue for a period of time not to exceed the duration of the indebtedness incurred for construction of the facility. The county or counties shall pay this cost and other costs incurred in the operation of the facility from the proceeds of the funds derived from the financing of the project and the housing of offenders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 47-5-938.
Offenders in counties to participate in work programs; implementation; reimbursement of costs incurred due to utilization of offenders; offender’s compensation fund; canteen operations fund.

Offenders are encouraged to participate in work programs. The chief corrections officer as created in Section 47-5-935, with ratification of the board of supervisors of the county in which a correctional facility established pursuant to Sections 47-5-931 through 47-5-941, is located, may enter into agreements to provide work for any state offender housed in the facility, with the approval of the Commissioner of Corrections, to perform any work:

Authorized in the Mississippi Prison Industries Act of 1990 as provided in Sections 47-5-531 through 47-5-575;

Authorized in the Prison Agricultural Enterprises Act as provided in Sections 47-5-351 through 47-5-357;

Authorized in the Penitentiary-Made Goods Law of 1978 as provided in Sections 47-5-301 through 47-5-331;

Authorized in the Public Service Work Programs Act as provided in Sections 47-5-401 through 47-5-421;

Authorized in Section 47-5-431, which authorizes the sheriff to use county or state offenders to pick up trash along public roads and state highways.

The chief corrections officer shall promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary to govern the work performance of the offenders for the parties to the agreements. Political subdivisions of the State of Mississippi including but not limited to counties, municipalities, school districts, drainage districts, water management districts and joint county-municipal endeavors are to have free use of the offender’s labor but are responsible for reimbursing the facility for costs of transportation, guards, meals and other necessary costs when the inmates are providing work for that political body. Offenders may be compensated for work performed if the agreement so provides.

There is created a special fund in the county treasury to be known as the “offender’s compensation fund.” All compensation paid to offenders shall be placed in the special fund for use by the offenders to purchase certain goods and other items of value as authorized in Section 47-5-109, for offenders housed in state correctional facilities. As provided in Section 47-5-194, no cash is to be paid to offenders. The agreement shall provide that a certain portion of the compensation shall be used for the welfare of the offenders. All money collected from the regional jail canteen operations shall be placed in a county special fund. Expenditures from that fund can be made by the chief corrections officer for any lawful purpose that is in the best interest and welfare of the offenders. The chief corrections officer, his employees and the county or counties owning the facility are given the authority necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The provisions of this section shall be supplemental to any other provisions of law regarding offender labor and work programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 547, § 34; Laws, 2001, ch. 398, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 47-5-939.
Housing pretrial detainees, county offenders and other persons.

In addition to housing offenders for the Department of Corrections, the Chief Corrections Officer may house pretrial detainees, county offenders and other persons legally subject to incarceration by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. All offenders are to be housed in accordance with American Corrections Association standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 47-5-940.
Authorization for drug and alcohol treatment pilot program at Bolivar County Regional Facility [Repealed effective July 3, 2022].

The Department of Corrections may contract with the Bolivar County Regional Facility for a five-year pilot program dedicated to an intensive and comprehensive alcohol and other drug treatment program for not more than two hundred fifty (250) inmates. The Bolivar County Regional Facility shall have the option of canceling the contract for the drug treatment program after giving the Department of Corrections thirty (30) days’ notice of its intent to cancel. The program shall be a prison-based treatment program designed to reduce substance abuse by inmates, correct dysfunctional thinking and behavioral patterns, and prepare inmates to make a successful and crime-free readjustment to the community.

The Department of Corrections shall reimburse the Bolivar County Regional Facility at the per diem rate allowed under Section 47-5-933.

An inmate who is within eighteen (18) months of his earned release date or parole date may be placed in the program.

The Department of Corrections shall remove any inmate within seventy-two (72) hours after being notified by the Bolivar County Regional Facility that the inmate is violent or refuses to participate in the drug treatment program.

The program shall consist, but is not limited to, the following components:

An assessment and placement component using a recidivism needs assessment of the inmates.

An intensive and comprehensive treatment and rehabilitation component which addresses the specific drug or alcohol problem of the inmate. This component shall include relapse prevention strategies and anger management strategies.

An aftercare post-release component that has a specific transition plan for each inmate. The transition plan must address specific post-release needs such as employment, housing, medical care, relapse prevention and treatment. The plan shall require personnel to assist the inmate with these needs and to assist in finding community-based programs for the inmate. The plan shall require the inmate to be tracked in at least thirty-day intervals to measure compliance with his established transition plan.

A monitoring assessment of recidivism containing post-release history of substance abuse, breaches of trust, arrests, convictions, employment, community functioning, and marital and family interaction.

The department shall file a report annually on the program with specific data on recidivism of inmates including the data required in subsection (3)(d).

The program authorized under this section may be renewed if it meets performance requirements as may be determined by the Legislature.

This section shall be repealed on July 3, 2022.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 617, § 13; Laws, 2007, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 504, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2018, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 409, § 1, eff from and after July 1 2018.

§ 47-5-941.
Authorization to contract with certain Wilkinson County authorities for private incarceration of state inmates.

In addition to any other authority granted by law, the Department of Corrections may contract with the Wilkinson County industrial development or economic development authority for the private incarceration of not more than one thousand (1,000) state inmates at a facility in Wilkinson County. Any such contract must comply with Sections 47-5-1211 through 47-5-1227.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 585, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1995).

§ 47-5-942.
Authorization to contract with a county to be determined by Department of Corrections for maximum security regional correctional facility.

The Department of Corrections, in its discretion, may contract with the board of supervisors of a county to be determined by the department, to house not more than five hundred (500) adult male maximum security state inmates in a maximum security regional correctional facility constructed only with local, federal or private funds.

The Department of Corrections may contract for a period of not more than twenty-five (25) years. The contract shall comply with the cost-savings requirements provided in Section 47-5-1211. The state shall retain responsibility for medical care for state offenders to the extent that is required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 536, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 47-5-943.
Contracts for incarceration; compliance with standards and statutes.

The Mississippi Department of Corrections may contract with the Walnut Grove Correctional Authority or the governing authorities of the Municipality of Walnut Grove, Leake County, Mississippi, to provide for the private housing, care and control of not more than one thousand five hundred (1,500) offenders who are in the custody of the Department of Corrections at a maximum security facility in Walnut Grove. A county or circuit judge shall not order any offender to be housed in the correctional facility authorized in Sections 47-5-943 through 47-5-953. Commitment of offenders shall not be to this facility, but shall be to the jurisdiction of the department. The commissioner shall assign newly sentenced offenders to an appropriate facility consistent with public safety. Any facility owned or leased by the Walnut Grove Correctional Authority or the Municipality of Walnut Grove for this purpose shall be designed, constructed, operated and maintained in accordance with American Correctional Association standards, and shall comply with all constitutional standards of the United States and the State of Mississippi and with all court orders that may now or hereinafter be applicable to the facility. The contract must comply with Sections 47-5-1211 through 47-5-1227.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 579, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 537, § 7; Laws, 2005, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 26, 2012.).

§ 47-5-945.
Contract restrictions; time; terms; medical care of offenders.

The Department of Corrections shall contract for the purposes set out in Section 47-5-943 for a period of not more than twenty (20) years. The Department of Corrections may include in the contract, as an inflation factor, a three percent (3%) annual increase in the contract price. The state shall retain responsibility for medical care for state offenders to the extent that is required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 47-5-947.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2012, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 1, 2012.

§47-5-947. [Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).]

§ 47-5-949.
Continuing education; high school level degree; vocational education.

The correctional facility authorized in Section 47-5-943 shall provide any juvenile offender housed in the facility with continuing education throughout his incarceration which leads to the presentation of a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma equivalent. The facility also shall provide a program of vocational education, which is to be included in the continuing education program for a high school diploma or High School Equivalency Diploma equivalent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 4; Laws, 2014, ch. 398, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-951.
Alcohol and drug counseling and treatment.

The correctional facility authorized in Section 47-5-943 shall provide each juvenile offender housed in the facility alcohol and drug counseling and treatment throughout his incarceration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 47-5-953.
Construction of subsequent facilities; locations; requirements and standards.

If a second public or private correctional facility for juvenile offenders is constructed, then the facility shall be located in Kemper County. The facility shall comply with the requirements and standards established in Sections 47-5-943 through 47-5-951.

If a third public or private correctional facility for juveniles is constructed, a site in North Mississippi and a site in South Mississippi shall be considered. If a site is chosen in North Mississippi, then preference shall be given to Quitman County. The facility shall comply with the requirements and standards established in Sections 47-5-943 through 47-5-951.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 562, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).